Arkansas statutes. Title 3 Alcoholic Beverages
Chapter 4 Alcoholic Beverages Generally — Permits
3-4-207. Ineligible persons.

The following persons described in this section shall not receive a permit under this title:

(1)

A person who has been convicted of an excluded felony;

(2)

A person under twenty-one (21) years of age;

(3)

A person who is not a citizen or resident alien of the United States;

(4)

A copartnership, unless all members of such copartnership are citizens or resident aliens of the United States;

(5)

A person who had his or her permit issued under this title revoked for cause or who has been convicted of a violation of this act until the expiration of two (2) years from the date of such revocation or conviction; or

(6)

A corporation or copartnership, if any of its officers or members have been convicted of a violation of this title or have had a permit issued under this title revoked for cause until two (2) years from the date of the conviction or revocation.

History.

Acts 1935, No. 108, Art. 3, § 11; Pope's Dig., § 14115; Acts 1945, No. 239, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-314; Acts 1991, No. 606, § 1; 1995, No. 652, § 8; 2017, No. 739, § 2.

Publisher's Notes.

Subdivision (1) of this section may be superseded by §17-1-103 which provides for the removal of an automatic disqualification for criminal convictions in obtaining permits and licenses for professions, trades, or occupations.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment, in the introductory language, substituted “The following persons” for “No”, and substituted “not receive a permit under this title” for “receive a permit”; substituted “an excluded felony” for “a felony” in (1); substituted “title” for “act” in (5) and twice in (6); and deleted “shall have” following “person who” in (5).

Meaning of “this act”.

See note to §3-4-202.

3-4-208. Applications — Procedure for acceptance and determination.

(a)

Applications for new permits will be accepted by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division after the publication of new census figures if the applications are warranted within a county or subdivision thereof.

(b)

When it has been determined that new applications are appropriate, the
division shall notify the public at large by legal notice that it will be accepting applications for a particular county or political subdivision thereof.

(c)

Applications will then be accepted from the affected area beginning thirty (30) days after the date of publication, and no applications will be accepted after ninety (90) days of the publication date.

(d)

All applications received from the affected area will then be processed and set for an Alcoholic Beverage Control Board meeting. The board meeting shall not be earlier than one hundred fifty (150) days after the publication of the legal notice specified in subsection (b) of this section, nor later than one hundred eighty (180) days after publication.

(e)

No later than fifteen (15) days prior to the hearing, each applicant for a new permit or his or her agent will be allowed to draw a number between one (1) and a number equal to the number of applicants having filed. The drawing will be conducted by the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division. Position numbers may not be assigned or transferred.

(f)

At the meeting the applications will be heard in order of the numbers drawn. There will only be as many applications heard as will equal the number of new permits allowed in the county or subdivision thereof.

(g)(1)

If the board finds that an applicant is qualified and that his or her proposed premises meet the public convenience and advantage of the area in question, then in that event the application will be approved.

(2)

No permit will issue earlier than thirty (30) days subsequent to the determination or until such time as the board determines it is necessary for final adjudication in the Arkansas courts, of any appeals arising out of such determinations, whichever is longer.

(h)

If the board has denied an application and the decision is not appealed or is upheld on appeal, then additional hearings will be held according to numbers already assigned in accordance with this section.

(i)

There shall be an initial application fee of two thousand dollars ($2,000). In the event an applicant is not successful in his or her application, one thousand dollars ($1,000) of that sum shall be refunded.

(j)

The annual permit renewal fee for permits authorized by this section and §§3-4-201 and3-4-202 will be the same as the renewal fee provided by §3-4-604 and §
3-7-111(a)(1)(D), or any subsequent amendments thereto.

(k)

The provisions of this section shall apply only to applications for permits to dispense vinous (except wines), spirituous, or malt liquor filed with the board after July 4, 1983.

History.

Acts 1935, No. 108, Art. 3, § 1; 1937, No. 80, § 1; Pope's Dig., § 14106; Acts 1955, No. 360, § 1; 1983, No. 812, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-301.

3-4-209. Applications — Contents.

In addition to such other information as the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division may determine shall be furnished in any application for permits under this act, the following information shall be given under oath:

(1)

The name, age, and residence of each applicant and, if there are more than one (1) and they are partners, the partnership name and residence of the several persons so applying and the facts as to his or her or their citizenship;

(2)

The name and residence of each person interested, or to become interested, in the business of any permittee for which the application is made, together with the nature of the interests. If the applicant is a corporation, the application shall set forth the name of the corporation, the names of its directors or other governing body, the name of its president, and the state under the laws of which it is organized;

(3)

That the premises to be permitted is identified by stating the street and number, if the premises has a street and number, and otherwise such apt description as will reasonably indicate the locality. The applicant shall also state the name of any other person, either as principal or associate, interested with the applicant either in the premises or in the business to be permitted; and

(4)

A statement that the applicant has not been convicted of a felony and has not had a permit issued to him, her, or them under this act revoked for cause within five (5) years preceding the date of application.

History.

Acts 1935, No. 108, Art. 3, § 7; Pope's Dig., § 14111; Acts 1945, No. 239, § 1; 1967, No. 239, § 1; 1973, No. 189, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-311; Acts 1991, No. 606, § 2; 2013, No. 325, § 2.

Publisher's Notes.

Subdivision (4) of this section may be superseded as to felony convictions by §17-1-103. See Publisher's Notes to §3-4-207.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment substituted “president” for “officers” in the second sentence of (2).

Meaning of “this act”.

See note to §3-4-202.

3-4-210. Applications — Notice requirements.

(a)(1)(A)

After filing an application with the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division and the acceptance of the application by the director, the applicant shall publish at least one (1) time a week for four (4) consecutive weeks in a legal newspaper of general circulation in the city or locality where the business is to be located a notice that the applicant has applied for a permit to sell alcoholic beverages at retail.

(B)

The newspaper publishing the notice shall have a physical address within the county of the proposed location of the retail business identified in the application.

(C)

If the county does not have a newspaper, then the publication shall be placed in a newspaper with the nearest physical address of the location of the retail business identified in the application.

(2)

The notice shall be in such form as the director shall prescribe by rule or order and shall be verified.

(3)

The notice shall give the names of the applicant and the business and shall state that the applicant is a resident of Arkansas, a citizen or resident alien of the United States, that he or she has good moral character, that he or she has never been convicted of a felony or had a license to sell alcoholic beverages revoked within the five (5) years preceding the date of notice, whether issued by this state or any other state, and that he or she has not been convicted of violating laws of this state or any other state governing the sale of alcoholic beverages within five (5) years preceding the date of the notice.

(b)(1)

Within five (5) days after filing an application for a permit to sell alcoholic beverages at retail at any premises, a notice of the application shall be posted in a conspicuous place at the entrance to the premises.

(2)

The applicant shall notify the director of the date when notice is first posted.

(3)

No permit shall be issued to any applicant until proper notice has been posted on the premises for at least thirty (30) consecutive days.

(4)(A)

The notice shall be in such form as the director shall prescribe by rule or order.

(B)

The notice shall be:

(i)

At least eleven inches (11") in width and seventeen inches (17") in height; and

(ii)

Printed in black lettering on a yellow background.

(c)(1)

Upon receipt by the director of an application for a permit, written notice thereof, which shall include a copy of the application, the application shall immediately be mailed by the director to the sheriff, chief of police, if located within a city, and prosecuting attorney of the locality in which the premises are situated, and to the city board of directors or other governing body of the city in which the premises are situated, if within an incorporated area.

(2)

No license shall be issued by the director until at least thirty (30) days have passed from the mailing by the director of the notices required by this section.

History.

Acts 1935, No. 108, Art. 3, § 7; Pope's Dig., § 14111; Acts 1945, No. 239, § 1; 1967, No. 239, § 1; 1973, No. 189, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-311; Acts 1989, No. 297, § 2; 1991, No. 606, § 3; 1995, No. 652, § 11; 2007, No. 735, § 1; 2013, No. 292, § 1.

Publisher's Notes.

Subdivision (a)(3) of this section may be superseded as to felony convictions by §17-1-103. See Publisher's Notes to §3-4-207.

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment, in (a)(1), substituted “Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division” for “director” and “four (4)” for “two (2)”; deleted “regulation” following “rule” in (a)(2) and (b)(4)(A); added (b)(4)(B) and made related changes; and inserted “the application” preceding “shall” in (c)(1).

The 2013 amendment redesignated former (a)(1) as (a)(1)(A); rewrote (a)(1)(A); and added (a)(1)(B) and (a)(1)(C).

3-4-211. Applications — Protests.

Upon receipt by the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division within thirty (30) days of a protest against issuance of a permit by a governing official of the city or county to whom the notice of an application for permit has been mailed, the director shall not issue the license until he or she has held a public hearing.

History.

Acts 1935, No. 108, Art. 3, § 7; Pope's Dig., § 14111; Acts 1945, No. 239, § 1; 1967, No. 239, § 1; 1973, No. 189, § 1; 1981, No. 790, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-311; Acts 2007, No. 735, § 2.

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment inserted “or she.”

3-4-212. Applications — Denial.

(a)

On all permit applications and administrative applications processed by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division, in the event that any such application is denied, one-half (½) of the stated amount of fee will be retained by the State of Arkansas to cover the costs of investigation and administrative processing of applications.

(b)

The remainder will be refunded to the applicant pursuant to established administrative procedures.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 675, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-311.1.

3-4-213. Applications — Appeals.

Any appeal from an order of the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division or the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board shall be made to the circuit court of the county in which the premises are situated or the Pulaski County Circuit Court. Appeals shall be governed by the terms of the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, §25-15-201 et seq.

History.

Acts 1935, No. 108, Art. 3, § 7; Pope's Dig., § 14111; Acts 1945, No. 239, § 1; 1967, No. 239, § 1; 1973, No. 189, § 1; 1981, No. 790, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-311.

3-4-214. Contents of permits.

A permit shall contain, in addition to any further information or material to be prescribed by the rules of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division, the following:

(1)

The name of the person to whom the permit is issued;

(2)

The kind of permit and what kind of traffic in vinous or spirituous or malt liquors is thereby permitted;

(3)

A description by street and number or otherwise of the permitted premises;

(4)

A statement in substance that the permit shall not be deemed a property or vested right and that it may be revoked at any time pursuant to law; and

(5)

The name and address of the owner of the premises. Upon a change in the ownership, the permittee or the new owner may file notice to that effect in writing with the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division on forms to be provided by the director for that purpose.

History.

Acts 1935, No. 108, Art. 3, § 9; Pope's Dig., § 14113; Acts 1953, No. 49, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-313; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 46.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in the introductory language.

3-4-215. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning notice when permit issued, was repealed by Acts 1995, No. 652, § 9. The section was derived from Acts 1935, No. 108, Art. 3, § 9; Pope's Dig., § 14113; Acts 1953, No. 49, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-313.

3-4-216. Renewal.

(a)

All permits issued by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division authorizing the dispensing, sale, or manufacture of alcoholic beverages are renewable on or before June 30 of each calendar year for the fiscal year beginning July 1.

(b)

Any person holding a permit who desires to renew the permit after June 30 shall be required to pay a late renewal penalty in the amount of one half (½) of the required yearly renewal fee for the permit for each sixty-day period, or any portion thereof, after June 30, wherein the renewal is tendered, in addition to the amount of the yearly fee.

(c)

Division permits may be renewed late by paying the stated penalty beginning July 1 and ending October 28 of each fiscal year.

(d)

No permit shall be renewed by the division for the current fiscal year after October 28.

(e)

No permit or license issued by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board to sell intoxicating liquor, beer, or any other form of alcoholic beverage shall be renewed by the division for a permit or license holder who is delinquent more than ninety (90) days on any alcoholic beverage sales tax, excise tax, supplemental mixed drink tax, or any other taxes relating to the sale or dispensation of alcoholic beverages, or any state and local gross receipts or compensating use taxes.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 420, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-313.1; Acts 1989, No. 300, § 1; 1993, No. 779, § 3; 1997, No. 1010, § 1; 1997, No. 1060, § 1; 1999, No. 319, § 1.

3-4-217. Transfer or assignment.

(a)

No permit shall be transferable or assignable.

(b)

No permit shall be pledged or deposited as collateral security for any loan or upon any other condition. Any pledge or deposit and any contract providing therefor shall be void.

(c)

A permit issued to any person, pursuant to this chapter, for any premises shall not be transferable to any other person or to any other premises or to any other part of the building containing the permitted premises. It shall be available only to the person therein specified and only for the premises permitted and no other.

History.

Acts 1935, No. 108, Art. 3, §§ 8, 9; Pope's Dig., §§ 14112, 14113; Acts 1953, No. 49, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 48-312, 48-313.

3-4-218. Permits restricted to permitted premises.

(a)(1)

No new liquor permits shall be issued to nor shall any outstanding liquor permit be transferred to any person, firm, or corporation by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division wherein the permitted premises of the liquor permittee is operated as a part of the profit-making business of any drug, grocery, sporting goods, dry goods, hardware, or general mercantile store.

(2)

However, the permittee may have tobacco products, mixers, soft drinks, consumables and edible products that complement alcoholic beverages, and other items customarily associated with the retail package sale of the liquors.

(3)

The division shall promulgate rules to facilitate the sale of complementary products under subdivision (a)(2) of this section.

(b)

However, this restriction shall not prohibit the transfer of a permit by the division resulting from the sale of a business for which a permit was issued on or before February 18, 1971.

(c)

It is further provided that in any instance where a retail liquor permit was issued after February 18, 1971, and the permitted premise is located outside an incorporated city or town and is located within five (5) miles of two (2) other liquor stores that were grandfathered in under the provisions of subsection (b) of this section, with each of the other stores being on either side of the newer liquor store, further where the newer liquor store and one (1) of the grandfathered liquor stores are both located in the same county and the second grandfathered liquor store is located in an adjoining county, and further where all three (3) subject liquor stores are located within one (1) mile of a federal interstate highway, then the middle liquor store may be considered as a grandfathered liquor store on the same basis as its competitors and may sell items which would not ordinarily be allowed if the permit were granted after February 18, 1971.

(d)

The holder of a retail liquor permit, as defined in §3-4-604, which is located in any city having a population of less than six hundred (600) persons and in a county having a population of less than sixteen thousand (16,000) persons according to the 2000 Federal Decennial Census and within three (3) miles of a river that serves as a common boundary between that county and another state shall be entitled, in addition to other privileges inherent under the permit, to sell food prepared on the licensed premises for off-premises consumption.

(e)(1)

A retail liquor permit issued under this subchapter is restricted to the location identified in the application required under §3-4-209(3).

(2)

A retail liquor permit shall not be used for multiple locations.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 106, § 3; 1977, No. 798, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-310.3; Acts 1999, No. 1594, § 1; 2003, No. 848, § 1; 2007, No. 457, § 1; 2011, No. 70, § 2; 2017, No. 508, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment added (d), and made a stylistic change in (c).

The 2011 amendment added (e).

The 2017 amendment inserted “consumables and edible products that complement alcoholic beverages” in (a)(2); and added (a)(3).

3-4-219. Fees — Duration.

(a)

Applications for permits shall be made for issuance only on January 1 or July 1 of each year.

(b)

Licenses issued as of January 1 will require the payment of one-half (½) the annual permit fee and the amount shall attach and operate as a lien as set forth in subsection (e) of this section at the time the permit is issued.

(c)

Each permit shall be issued for an indeterminate period, and the permit fees prescribed by the provisions of this act shall be paid annually in advance on or before June 30 of each calendar year for the fiscal year beginning July 1.

(d)

Each permit issued pursuant to this act shall remain valid until revoked or suspended so long as the prescribed annual permit fee shall be paid as required by law.

(e)

All permit or license fees shall attach to and operate as a lien on the property, on and in the permitted premises or elsewhere, belonging to the person from whom such fees are due.

History.

Acts 1935, No. 108, Art. 3, § 9; Pope's Dig., § 14113; Acts 1953, No. 49, § 1; 1983, No. 420, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 48-313, 48-313.1.

Meaning of “this act”.

See note to §3-4-202.

3-4-220. Duplicate permits.

Whenever a permit shall be lost or destroyed without fault on the part of the permittee or his or her agents or employees, a duplicate permit in lieu thereof may be issued by the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division in his or her discretion and in accordance with its rules, on payment of a fee of five dollars ($5.00).

History.

Acts 1935, No. 108, Art. 3, § 20; Pope's Dig., § 14125; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-320; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 47.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules”.

3-4-221. Transfer of permitted location.

The Alcoholic Beverage Control Board shall not authorize the transfer of a permit to dispense vinous (except small farm wines), spirituous, or malt liquor from one location to another location within a city or town located within a county having a population of two hundred thousand (200,000) or more persons, according to the most recent federal decennial census, if the transfer of the permit to a location in the city or town will result in there being more than one (1) permitted location in the city or town for every seven thousand five hundred (7,500) population in the city or town, according to the most recent federal decennial census.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 861, § 1; 2013, No. 1068, § 2; 2019, No. 571, § 2.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment inserted “small farm” preceding “wines”, substituted “a location to another location” for “any location to a location”, and “five thousand (5,000)” for “four thousand (4,000)”.

The 2019 amendment substituted “one location” for “a location”; substituted “city or town for every seven thousand five hundred (7,500) population” for “city or town for each five thousand (5,000) population”; and made a stylistic change.

3-4-222. Reapplication.

(a)(1)

Whenever any application for any type of alcoholic beverage control permit with the exception of a private club permit being sought in an area in which the sale of alcoholic beverages is not allowed shall be denied, no application for a permit shall be accepted from that same applicant or real party in interest for a period of one (1) year following the date on which such application is finally acted upon by the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division, by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board on appeal, or by the appellate court system, unless the applicant or real party in interest can show a substantial change in the underlying facts which supported the decision to deny the application.

(2)

Provided, this subchapter shall not apply if the application was denied solely because of disapproval of the location of the premises and if a new application is for a premises other than that described in the original application.

(3)

“Same applicant” or “same real party in interest” as used in this subsection (a) shall be broadly interpreted by the director or the board to be the real party or parties in interest in the original application notwithstanding the fact that the subsequent application may be made in the name of a family member, business associate, or new business entity.

(b)

Reapplication for a private club in an area where the retail sale of alcoholic beverages is not legal will continue to be controlled by §3-9-228.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 519, § 1; 1999, No. 1593, § 1.

3-4-223. Diversity in ownership and financial interest.

When issuing a permit under Title 3 of the Arkansas Code, the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division shall consider lack of diversity in ownership and financial interest in the geographic area at issue in the permit application.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 2323, § 1.

Subchapter 3

— Revocation

Cross References.

Licenses and permits, removal of disqualification for criminal offenses, §17-1-103.

Procedure for revocation and suspension of licenses, §§3-2-212 —3-2-217.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1935, No. 108, Art. 10: approved Mar. 16, 1935. Emergency clause provided: “Whereas, the repeal of the Eighteenth Amendment to the Constitution of the United States has created an emergency which requires immediate control of intoxicating liquors; and

“Whereas, the present state revenue does not meet the needs for the maintenance and development of the State Government and its agencies and the state's credit is threatened with impairment, an emergency is declared to exist and this act shall become a law and be effective on its passage and approval or nonaction by the Governor.”

Acts 1969, No. 221, § 4: Mar. 10, 1969. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that many retailers are in arrears in the payment of the Arkansas Gross Receipts Tax, the franchise tax, or the special 3% Alcoholic Beverages Excise Tax and that the State Revenue Department is unable to collect such taxes; that at present there is no method for effectively collecting such taxes from such retailers; and that in order to correct this situation, it is necessary that this act become effective immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2011, No. 70, § 4: Feb. 18, 2011. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act is necessary to prevent unfair competition; that this act is also necessary to ensure that those persons receiving retail liquor permits continue to abide by the spirit and intent of the law; and that this act is immediately necessary to ensure that, through the permitting process, citizens are protected from the illegal sale of alcoholic beverages. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

3-4-301. Grounds for revocation.

(a)

Any permit issued pursuant to this act may be revoked for cause and must be revoked for the following causes:

(1)

Conviction of the permittee or his or her agent or employee for selling any illegal beverages on the premises permitted;

(2)

For making any false material statement in an application for a permit;

(3)

If, within a period of two (2) years, there shall have been two (2) convictions for any violation of this act by a permittee, or two (2) convictions of any of his or her clerks, agents, employees, or servants of any violation of this act on the premises permitted;

(4)

For transferring, assigning, or hypothecating a permit;

(5)

Violating the provisions of §3-1-103(c) which shall cause a forfeiture of the permit of all parties to the violation;

(6)

For selling or agreeing to sell any spirituous, vinous, or malt liquors to a wholesaler, rectifier, or dispensary who is not permitted at the time of the agreement and sale to receive, store, transport, sell, and dispense same under the provisions of this act;

(7)

For failure or default of a permittee to pay any license or permit tax or any part thereof or penalties imposed by this act and for a violation of any rule of the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration or the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division in pursuance thereof;

(8)

If a retail liquor permitee directly or indirectly remunerates any person, firm, or corporation that has a direct or indirect pecuniary, proprietary, or financial interest in the creation, establishment, operation, or contractual branding of another permitted liquor establishment;

(9)

If a retail liquor permitee directly or indirectly receives remuneration from any other retail liquor permitee relating to the creation, establishment, operation, or contractual branding of another permitted liquor establishment; or

(10)

Except for a holder of a vested permit, if a retail liquor permitee brands the permitted location with the same name or logo as another retail liquor permitee.

(b)(1)

Whenever any person holding a retailer's permit to sell and dispense vinous or spirituous liquors for beverage purposes at retail shall fail to pay any Arkansas gross receipts tax, franchise tax, or the three percent (3%) special alcoholic beverage excise tax within sixty (60) days after the taxes become due, the secretary shall notify the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board of that fact and the board shall immediately revoke such permit.

(2)

It shall be unlawful for the board or any person to restore or issue a retailer's permit to any person whose permit has been revoked under the provisions of this subsection within two (2) years from the date of the revocation.

History.

Acts 1935, No. 108, Art. 3, § 13; Pope's Dig., § 14117; Acts 1969, No. 221, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 48-316, 48-316.1; Acts 2011, No. 70, § 3; 2015, No. 1142, § 1[2]; 2019, No. 910, §§ 3306, 3307.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment added (a)(8)–(10).

The 2015 amendment substituted “If” for “Subsequent to March 1, 2011, if” in (a)(8) and (9); and substituted “Except for a holder of a vested permit” for “Subsequent to March 1, 2011” in (a)(10).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary” for “Director” in (a)(7) and (b)(1).

Meaning of “this act”.

Acts 1935, No. 108, codified as §§3-1-101 —3-1-103,3-2-101,3-2-205,3-3-101 —3-3-103,3-3-212,3-3-401,3-3-404,3-3-405,3-4-101 —3-4-103,3-4-201,3-4-202,3-4-207 —3-4-211,3-4-213,3-4-214,3-4-215 [repealed],3-4-217,3-4-219,3-4-220,3-4-301 —3-4-303,3-4-501,3-4-503,3-4-601 —3-4-605,3-8-301,3-8-302 [repealed],3-8-303,3-8-304 [repealed],3-8-305 —3-8-310,3-8-311 [repealed],3-8-313 —3-8-317,23-12-708.

Cross References.

Revocation for misstatement or concealment of fact in beer license application, §3-5-303.

3-4-302. Statement of causes of revocation.

(a)

There shall be printed and furnished by the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division to each permittee a statement of the causes for which permits may be revoked under law.

(b)

The statement shall be prepared by the director and delivered to the permittee with his or her permit or as soon as may be practicable thereafter.

(c)

Any amendments therein shall also be sent by the director to all permittees as soon as may be practicable after the amendment.

(d)

Failure to send the statement or changes therein, or failure to receive them, or any misstatement or error contained in the statement or amendments shall, however, not be an excuse or justification for any violation of law or prevent or remit or decrease any penalty or forfeiture therefor.

History.

Acts 1935, No. 108, Art. 3, § 9; 1953, No. 49, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-313.

3-4-303. Notice — Surrender of permit.

(a)(1)

Within three (3) days after a permit shall have been revoked, notice thereof shall be given to the permittee by mailing the notice addressed to him or her at the premises permitted.

(2)

Notice shall also be mailed to the owner of the premises permitted.

(b)

The holder of the permit shall thereupon surrender the permit to the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division.

(c)

The mailing of the permit by the permittee to the director by registered mail or insured parcel post shall be deemed sufficient compliance with this provision.

(d)(1)

The director, immediately upon notice of revocation, shall serve a written notice thereof upon the chief of police or chief police officer and the city clerk of the city or town in which the premises for which the revoked permit was issued is situated, or upon the sheriff of the county in case the permit was issued for premises situated outside a city or town.

(2)

This notice shall include a statement of the number of the permit, the name and place of residence of the holder, the location of the permitted premises, and the date when the permit was revoked.

(e)

In case the permit is not immediately surrendered, the director shall issue a written demand for the surrender of the permit and deliver the demand to the sheriff of the county in which the permitted premises are located or to any Alcoholic Beverage Control Enforcement Division agent. The sheriff or division agent shall immediately take possession of the permit and return the permit to the director.

History.

Acts 1935, No. 108, Art. 3, § 15; Pope's Dig., § 14119; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-318.

Subchapter 4

— Violations

Cross References.

Prohibited practices, §3-3-101 et seq.

Effective Dates.

Acts 2009, No. 294, § 30: Mar. 3, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that on-premises consumption outlets in the State of Arkansas are not able to compete on an equal and similar basis with outlets located in states surrounding the State of Arkansas; that the State of Arkansas is in need of additional revenues; that only minor adjustments to the violation fine schedule have been made since its passage in 1981; and that this act is immediately necessary to raise additional revenues and to better address violations committed by Alcoholic Beverage Control Division permit holders. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2009, Nos. 605 and 606, § 27: Mar. 25, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the people of the State of Arkansas overwhelmingly approved the establishment of lotteries at the 2008 General Election; that lotteries will provide funding for scholarships to the citizens of this state; that the failure to immediately implement this act will cause a reduction in lottery proceeds that will harm the educational and economic success of potential students eligible to receive scholarships under the act; and that the state lotteries should be implemented as soon as possible to effectuate the will of the citizens of this state and implement lottery-funded scholarships as soon as possible. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

3-4-401. Authorization to impose fines.

In addition to all other sanctions and penalties which may be administratively imposed by the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division pursuant to the procedures outlined in this title and the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, §25-15-201 et seq., the director shall have the power and authority to levy fines and suspend them against controlled beverage permit holders when the director determines the permit holder has violated the alcoholic beverage control laws of this state or rules of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 790, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-346; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 48.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations”.

3-4-402. Classes of violations and fines — Multiple offenses.

(a)

The following classes of alcoholic beverage control permit violations and fines are authorized to be levied and are established:

(1)

Class A permit violations: Five hundred dollars ($500) to one thousand dollars ($1,000);

(2)

Class B permit violations: Two hundred dollars ($200) to five hundred dollars ($500); and

(3)

Class C permit violations: One hundred dollars ($100) to two hundred dollars ($200).

(b)

The Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division and the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board are hereby authorized to levy additional fines up to double the amount for the classes of violations found in subsection (a) of this section for a second offense of the same violation within a twelve-month period, and up to three (3) times the fines authorized for the classes listed in subsection (a) of this section for a third offense of the same violation within a twelve-month period.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 790, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-346; Acts 1989, No. 296, § 1; 1993, No. 172, § 1.